nb: Biljarddisiplin: 10-ball; 14.1 kontinuerlig; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank pool; Blackball; Karambole; Kinesisk 8-ball; Engelsk biljard; Engelsk pool; One-pocket; Russisk pyramide; Snooker; Straight pool; Tre-vant; Annet
el: Είδος του μπιλιάρδου: 10-Ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-Ball; 9-Ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Γαλλικό μπιλιάρδο; Κινέζικο Eight-Ball; Αγγλικό μπιλιάρδο; Αγγλικό Pool; One-Pocket; Ρώσικη πυραμίδα; Σνούκερ; Straight Pool; Τρίσποντο (Three-Cushion); Άλλο
hu: Biliárd sportág: 10-golyós; 14.1 Continuous; 8-golyós; 9-golyós; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambol; Kínai 8-golyós; Angol biliárd; Angol pool; One-Pocket; Orosz piramis; Snooker; Straight Pool; Háromfalas; Egyéb
pt-PT: Disciplina de bilhar: Bola 10; 14.1 contínuo; Bola 8; Bola 9; Bank pool; Blackball; Carambola; Bola 8 chinesa; Bilhar inglês; Pool inglês; Um buraco; Pirâmide russa; Snooker; Straight pool; Três tabelas; Outros
en: Billiards discipline: 10-Ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-Ball; 9-Ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carom; Chinese Eight-Ball; English Billiards; English Pool; One-Pocket; Russian Pyramid; Snooker; Straight Pool; Three-Cushion; Other
fi: Biljardilaji: 10-pallo; 14.1 (Straight pool); 8-pallo; 9-pallo; Vallipool; Blackball; Karamboli; Kiinalainen kasipallo; Englantilainen biljardi; Englantilainen pool; Yhden pussin pool; Venäläinen pyramidi; Snooker; Straight pool; Kolmen vallin karamboli; Muu
bg-BG: Дисциплина билярд: Десетка (10-Ball); 14.1 непрекъсната; Осмица (8-Ball); Деветка (9-Ball); Банк пул; Блекбол; Карамбол; Китайска осмица; Английски билярд; Английски пул; Един джоб; Руска пирамида; Снукър; Стрейт пул; Карамбол с три спонта; Други
hr-HR: Disciplina bilijara: Desetka; 14.1 kontinuirano (straight pool); Osmica; Devetka; Bank pool; Blackball; Karambol; Kineska osmica; Engleski biljar; Engleski biljar (pool); Jedna rupa (one-pocket); Ruska piramida; Snooker; Straight pool; Karambol s tri mantinele; Ostalo
sv: Biljarddisciplin: 10-ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank pool; Blackball; Carambole; Kinesisk 8-ball; Engelsk biljard; Engelsk pool; One-pocket; Rysk pyramid; Snooker; Straight pool; Trevallars carambole; Övrigt
ja: ビリヤードの規律: 10ボール; 14.1コンティニュアス; 8ボール; 9ボール; バンクプール; ブラックボール; キャロム; チャイニーズエイトボール; イングリッシュビリヤード; イングリッシュプール; ワンポケット; ロシアンピラミッド; スヌーカー; ストレートプール; スリークッション; その他
zh-CN: 台球项目: 10 球; 14.1 连续击球; 8 球; 9 球; 翻袋台球; 黑球; 开仑; 中式八球; 英式台球; 英式普尔; 单袋台球; 俄式台球; 斯诺克; 14-1 台球; 三边开仑; 其他
th: ประเภทกีฬาบิลเลียด: 10 ลูก; 14.1 Continuous; 8 ลูก; 9 ลูก; แบงก์พูล; แบล็กพูล; แครอม; เอทบอลจีน; บิลเลียดอังกฤษ; พูลอังกฤษ; วันพ็อกเก็ต; รัสเซียนพีระมิด; สนุกเกอร์; สเตรทพูล; ทรีคูชั่น; อื่นๆ
pl: Dyscyplina bilardowa: Dziesiątka; 14.1 Continuous; Ósemka; Dziewiątka; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambol; Chińska ósemka; Bilard angielski; Bilard angielski (pool); One-Pocket; Piramida rosyjska; Snooker; Straight Pool; Karambol 3-bandowy; Inne
fr: Discipline de billard: Jeu de la 10; 14/1 continu; Jeu de la 8; Jeu de la 9; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carambole; 8-ball chinois; Billard anglais; Pool anglais; One-Pocket; Pyramide russe; Snooker; Straight Pool; Trois bandes; Autre
ru: Дисциплина бильярда: Пул-10; Стрейт-пул (14.1); Пул-8; Пул-9; Банк-пул; Блэкбол; Карамболь; Китайский пул (восьмерка); Английский бильярд; Английский пул; В одну лузу (One-Pocket); Русский бильярд (пирамида); Снукер; Стрейт-пул; Трехбортный карамболь; Другое
zh-TW: 撞球運動項目: 10 號球; 14.1 連續擊球; 8 號球; 9 號球; 顆星撞球; 英式 8 號球 (Blackball); 開侖; 中式 8 號球; 英式撞球; 英式花式撞球; 單袋撞球; 俄羅斯撞球; 斯諾克; 14-1 連續擊球; 三顆星; 其他
pt-BR: Modalidade de bilhar: Bola 10; 14.1 Contínuo; Bola 8; Bola 9; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carambola; Bola 8 chinesa; Bilhar inglês; Pool inglês; One-Pocket; Pirâmide russa; Snooker; Straight Pool; Três Tabelas; Outro
nl: Biljard discipline: 10-ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carambole; Chinese 8-ball; English Billiards; English Pool; One-Pocket; Russische Pyramide; Snooker; Straight Pool; Driebanden; Anders
de: Billarddisziplin: 10-Ball; 14/1 endlos; 8-Ball; 9-Ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambolage; Chinese 8-Ball; English Billiards; English Pool; One-Pocket; Russisches Billard; Snooker; Straight Pool; Dreiband; Sonstige
sl-SI: Biljardna različica: 10 krogel; 14.1 Continuous; 8 krogel; 9 krogel; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambol; Kitajska osemka; Angleški biljard; Angleški pool; One-Pocket; Ruska piramida; Snooker; Straight Pool; Trojni odboj (Three-Cushion); Drugo
lt-LT: Biliardo rūšis: Pulas-10; Pulas-14.1; Pulas-8; Pulas-9; „Bank Pool“; „Blackball“; Karambolis; Kiniškas aštuoniukės pulas; Angliškas biliardas; Angliškas pulas; „One-Pocket“ pulas; Rusiškas biliardas (Piramidė); Snukeris; Pulas-14.1 („Straight Pool“); Trijų bortų karambolis; Kita
es: Disciplina de billar: Bola 10; 14.1 continuo; Bola 8; Bola 9; Bank pool; Blackball; Carambola; Bola 8 chino; Billar inglés; Pool inglés; One-pocket; Pirámide rusa; Snooker; Pool directo; Tres bandas; Otro
cs: Typ úložné hrany bubnu: 10-ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambol; Čínský 8-ball; Anglický kulečník; Anglický pool; One-Pocket; Ruská pyramida; Snooker; Straight Pool; Trojband; Jiné
da: Billarddisciplin: 10-ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank pool; Blackball; Karambole; Kinesisk 8-ball; Engelsk billard; Engelsk pool; One-pocket; Russisk billard; Snooker; Straight pool; Trebande-karambole; Andet
vi: Bộ môn bi-a: Bida 10 bóng; 14.1 Continuous; Bida 8 bóng; Bida 9 bóng; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carom; Bida 8 bóng Trung Quốc; Bida Anh; English Pool; One-Pocket; Russian Pyramid; Snooker; Straight Pool; Bida 3 băng; Khác
sk-SK: Disciplína biliardu: 10-ball; 14.1 Continuous; 8-ball; 9-ball; Bank Pool; Blackball; Karambol; Chinese 8-ball; Anglický biliard; Anglický pool; One-pocket; Ruská pyramída; Snooker; Straight Pool; Three-Cushion; Iné
it: Disciplina del biliardo: Palla 10; 14.1 Continuo; Palla 8; Palla 9; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carambola; Palla 8 cinese; Biliardo inglese; Pool inglese; One-Pocket; Piramide russa; Snooker; Straight Pool; Tre sponde; Altro
ko: 당구 종목: 10구; 14.1 컨티뉴어스; 8구; 9구; 뱅크 풀; 블랙볼; 캐롬; 중국식 8구; 잉글리시 빌리어드; 잉글리시 풀; 원 포켓; 러시안 피라미드; 스누커; 스트레이트 풀; 3쿠션; 기타
tr: Bilardo disiplini: 10 Top; 14.1 Sürekli; 8 Top; 9 Top; Bant Bilardo; Blackball; Karambol; Çin 8 Top; İngiliz Bilardosu; İngiliz Pool; Tek Cepli; Rus Piramidi; Snooker; Straight Pool; 3 Bant; Diğer
ro-RO: Disciplina de biliard: Bila 10; 14.1 Continuu; Bila 8; Bila 9; Bank Pool; Blackball; Carambol; Bila 8 chinezesc; Biliard englezesc; Pool englezesc; One-Pocket; Piramidă rusească; Snooker; Straight Pool; Trei mante; Altele